Washington statutes.
RCW 39.62.020

Facsimile signature—Authorized—Legal effect.

Any authorized officer, after filing with the secretary of state his or her manual signature certified by him or her under oath, may execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his or her manual signature:

(1) Any public security: PROVIDED, That at least one signature required or permitted to be placed thereon shall be manually subscribed, and

(2) Any instrument of payment.

Upon compliance with this chapter by the authorized officer, his or her facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his or her manual signature.

[ 2011 c 336 s 811; 1969 c 86 s 2.]